Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 5
MUNICIPAL WATER AND SEWER BOARDS

31-35-501. Creation of board.

The governing body of any city or town, organized under a special act or home rule charter or under the general laws of the state, has the power to create, by ordinance, a nonpolitical local legislative body designated as a board of commissioners, referred to in this part 5 as the "board", to have complete charge and control of the sewerage facilities or water facilities or joint water and sewer system of such city or town, as designated in such ordinance, in which board are vested all powers, rights, privileges, and duties vested in the city or town creating the board and pertaining to the type of facilities or system designated in such ordinance.

The exercise of any and all executive, administrative, and ministerial powers may be delegated and redelegated by the board to officials and employees of the city or town employed by the board.

The board shall indicate the capacity in which the city or town is acting when such actions are taken by the board, e.g., "the city (town) of ................, acting by and through its board of water and sewer commissioners".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1261, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-418 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-502. Board - appointments - removal - bonds - meetings.

The municipality shall by ordinance prescribe the number of commissioners, their qualifications, their terms of office, methods for their election or appointment or removal, the amount and nature of any fidelity bond required to be given, the number of meetings required to be held, their compensation, if any, the selection and term of office of its officers, and such other matters concerning the board as are not in conflict with this part 5.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1261, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-419 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-503. Oath - officers.

Each commissioner, before assuming the duties of his office, shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation before an officer authorized to administer oaths that he will support the constitutions and laws of the United States and of this state and that he will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of his office to the best of his ability. Such oath or affirmation shall be filed in the office of the clerk or secretary of the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1261, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-420 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-504. Board's administrative powers.

The board, on behalf and in the name of the municipality, has the following powers:

To fix the time and place at which its regular meetings shall be held within the municipality and to provide for the calling and holding of special meetings;

To adopt and amend or otherwise modify bylaws and rules for procedure;

To prescribe by resolution a system of business administration, to create any and all necessary offices, and to establish and reestablish the powers, duties, and compensation of all officers, agents, and employees and other persons contracting with the board, subject to the provisions of any ordinance adopted pursuant to section 31-35-502; but, except as may be otherwise therein provided, such compensation shall be established at prevailing rates of pay for equivalent services.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1261, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-421 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-505. Meetings of board.

All meetings of the board shall be held within the municipality and shall be open to the public.

No business of the board shall be transacted except at a regular or special meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the total membership of the board is present.

Any action of the board shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present and voting thereon.

A smaller number of directors than a quorum may adjourn from time to time and may compel the attendance of absent members in such manner and under such penalties as the board may provide by resolution or by law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1262, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-422 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-506. Additional administrative powers.

The board, on behalf and in the name of the municipality, also has the following powers:

To require and fix the amount of all official fidelity and completion bonds necessary or desirable and convenient in the opinion of the board for the protection of the funds and property of the municipality under the jurisdiction of the board, subject to the provisions of any ordinance adopted pursuant to section 31-35-502 regarding fidelity bonds for commissioners;

To prescribe a method of auditing and allowing or rejecting claims and demands subject to the provisions of section 31-35-507;

To provide a method for the letting of contracts on a fair and competitive basis for the construction of works, the facilities, or any project or any interest therein or the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies as required in part 4 of this article and this part 5 and to require a contractor's bond in the manner required of a governing body and a municipality in sections 38-26-105 to 38-26-107, C.R.S.;

To designate an official newspaper published in the municipality or, if none, of general circulation therein and to publish any notice or other instrument in any additional newspaper where the board deems that it is necessary or advisable to do so; and

To make and pass resolutions and orders on behalf of the municipality not repugnant to the provisions of part 4 of this article and this part 5 which are necessary or proper for the government and management of the affairs of the municipality, for the execution of the powers vested in the municipality, and for carrying into effect the provisions of part 4 of this article and this part 5 in connection with the facilities or joint system designated in the ordinance creating the board.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1262, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-423 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-507. Budgets, accounts, and audits.

The board, in connection with the facilities or joint system under the board's jurisdiction, shall adopt a budget for each fiscal year of the municipality, shall maintain accounts, and shall cause an annual audit to be made pertaining to the financial affairs of the board as provided in parts 1, 5, and 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., except as otherwise provided in part 4 of this article and this part 5.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1262, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-424 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-508. Records of board.

On all resolutions and orders, the roll shall be called, and the ayes and noes shall be recorded. All resolutions and orders, as soon as may be after their passage, shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose and shall be authenticated by the signature of the presiding officer of the board and the secretary or secretary pro tem.

Every legislative act of the board of a general or permanent nature shall be by resolution.

The book of resolutions and orders shall be a public record. A record shall also be made of all other proceedings of the board, minutes of the meetings, certificates, contracts, bonds given by officers, employees, and any other agents of the municipality under the board's jurisdiction, and all corporate acts, which record shall also be a public record.

The treasurer shall keep strict and accurate accounts of all moneys received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the board in a permanent record, which also shall be a public record.

Any permanent record of the municipality under the board's jurisdiction shall be open for inspection by any elector thereof, by any other interested person, or by any representative of the federal government, the state, or any other public body.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1263, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-425 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-509. Conflicts in interest prohibited.

No commissioner nor officer, employee, or agent of the municipality under the board's jurisdiction shall be interested in any contract or transaction with the municipality except in his official representative capacity or as is provided in his contract of employment with the municipality, subject to the provisions of any ordinance adopted pursuant to section 31-35-502.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1263, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-426 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-510. Authorization of facilities.

The municipality, acting by and through the board, may acquire, improve, equip, relocate, maintain, and operate the facilities or joint system under the board's jurisdiction, any project, or any part thereof for the benefit of the municipality and the inhabitants thereof after the board has made such preliminary studies and otherwise taken such action as it determines to be necessary or desirable as preliminaries thereto.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1263, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-427 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-511. Implementing powers.

The board, in connection with the facilities or joint system of the municipality under the board's jurisdiction and any project pertaining thereto, may from time to time condemn, otherwise acquire, improve, equip, operate, maintain, and dispose of property within or without or both within and without the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1263, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-428 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-512. Additional powers of municipality.

The municipality, acting by and through the board, has the following powers:

To have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities pertaining to a body corporate and politic and constituting a municipal corporation and political subdivision of the state established as an instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental and proprietary functions to provide for the public health, safety, and general welfare;

To have perpetual existence and succession;

To adopt, have, and use a corporate seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

To sue and to be sued and to be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;

To commence, maintain, intervene in, defend, comprise, terminate by settlement or otherwise, otherwise participate in, and assume the cost and expense of any and all actions and proceedings pertaining to the municipality, its board, its officers, agents, or employees, or any of the municipality's powers, duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities, the facilities or joint system, or any project pertaining thereto or any property of the municipality;

To enter into contracts and agreements, including but not limited to contracts with the federal government, the state, and any other public body; and

To trade, exchange, purchase, condemn, or otherwise acquire, operate, maintain, and dispose of real property and personal property, including interest therein, either within or without or both within and without the territorial limits of the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1263, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-429 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-513. Financial powers of municipality.

The municipality, acting by and through the board, also has the following powers:

To borrow money and to issue municipal securities evidencing any loan to or amount due by the municipality, to provide for and secure the payment of any municipal securities and the rights of the holders thereof, and to purchase, hold, and dispose of municipal securities; and

To fund or refund any loan or obligation of the municipality and to issue funding or refunding securities to evidence such loan or obligation without any election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1264, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-430 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-514. Other powers of board.

The delineation of powers in this part 5 which may be exercised by the board does not by implication deny any other powers which are otherwise granted to the municipality by law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1264, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-431 as it existed prior to 1975.